Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.900

Effective date—1973 1st ex.s. c 122.

This chapter shall take effect on July 1, 1974.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 122 s 17.]

NOTES:

Funding required: "This bill shall not take effect until the funds necessary for its implementation have been specifically appropriated by the legislature and such appropriation itself has become law. It is the intention of the legislature that if the governor shall veto this section or any item thereof, none of the provisions of this bill shall take effect." [ 1973 1st ex.s. c 122 s 21.]

Reviser's note: Funding for 1973 1st ex.s. c 122 was provided in 1973 1st ex.s. c 137 s 107 and 1975 1st ex.s. c 269 s 67(2).